Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 1. Generally.

§ 27-51.
Exits from public halls, theaters and opera houses.

All owners or lessees of public halls, theaters or opera houses situated in any city or town, or in any county which has elected to come under the provisions of Article 1 (§

27-6.01

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of this title, shall provide suitable and sufficient exits from such buildings. The doors to the exits shall remain unlocked during all performances or public gatherings in the buildings, and shall in all cases open outwardly, and not inwardly.

History.

Code 1919, § 3142; R. P. 1948, §

27-36

.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 1 (§

27-6.01

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of this title” was substituted for “Article 1 (§

27-6.1

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of this title.”

§ 27-52.
Inspection of buildings designated in preceding section.

In cities and towns having police and fire departments or having a fire inspector employed by such city or town, the respective heads of such departments and the mayor of such city or town shall, as a committee of three, or the fire inspector of such city or town, inspect at least semiannually, all buildings mentioned in §

27-51

which are located in their city or town, and see that the provisions thereof are complied with.

In cities and towns which do not possess police and fire departments or a fire inspector, the mayor and two members of the council to be selected by the mayor shall, as a committee of three, inspect all such buildings located in their city or town semiannually, and see that the provisions of §

27-51

are complied with. Any such building as to which such provisions have not been complied with, may be closed by order of the mayor of the city or town until the provisions are complied with.

History.

Code 1919, § 3143; R. P. 1948, §

27-37

; 1974, c. 41.

§ 27-53.
Penalty for violating § 27-51; separate offenses.

Any owner or lessee of any such building, who shall violate any of the provisions of §

27-51

, shall be punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, or by confinement in jail not less than 6 nor more than 12 months, or by both. The continuation of any failure to comply with the provisions of such section for each week after notice has been given the owner or lessee of the buildings that the exits are unsafe or insufficient shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

Code 1919, § 3144; R. P. 1948, §

27-38

.

§ 27-54.
Governing body to make additional safety provisions.

The governing body of any city or town, or of any such county, shall make such further provisions insuring the safety of the public using such buildings as is mentioned in §

27-51

as such governing body may see proper to make, not in conflict with such section.

History.

Code 1919, § 3145; R. P. 1948, §

27-39

.